test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VLONG_NoExtra_aamoo_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giaamooiminaanibanag
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giaamooiminaanibaning
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giaamooiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giaamooiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giaamooiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giaamooimiwaaibanan
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giaamooimiwaaibanag
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giaamooimiwaaibaning
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giaamooimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giaamooimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giaamooimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giaamooiminiibanan
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giaamooiminiibanag
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giaamooiminiibaning
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giaamooimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giaamooimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giaamooimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oaamooiminaanibanan
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oaamooiminaanibanag
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oaamooiminaanibaning
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oaamooiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oaamooiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oaamooiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oaamooimiwaaibanan
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oaamooimiwaaibanag
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oaamooimiwaaibaning
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oaamooimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oaamooimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oaamooimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oaamooiminiibanan
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oaamooiminiibanag
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oaamooiminiibaning
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oaamooimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oaamooimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oaamooimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niaamooishinaanibanan
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niaamooishinaanibanag
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niaamooishinaanibaning
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niaamooishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niaamooishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niaamooishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niaamooishiwaaibanan
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niaamooishiwaaibanag
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niaamooishiwaaibaning
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niaamooishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niaamooishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niaamooishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niaamooishiniibanan
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niaamooishiniibanag
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niaamooishiniibaning
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niaamooishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niaamooishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niaamooishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giaamooishinaanibanan
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giaamooishinaanibanag
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giaamooishinaanibaning
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giaamooishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giaamooishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giaamooishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giaamooishiwaaibanan
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giaamooishiwaaibanag
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giaamooishiwaaibaning
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giaamooishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giaamooishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giaamooishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giaamooishiniibanan
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giaamooishiniibanag
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giaamooishiniibaning
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giaamooishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giaamooishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giaamooishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oaamooishinaanibanan
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oaamooishinaanibanag
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oaamooishinaanibaning
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oaamooishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oaamooishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oaamooishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oaamooishiwaaibanan
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oaamooishiwaaibanag
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oaamooishiwaaibaning
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oaamooishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oaamooishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oaamooishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oaamooishiniibanan
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oaamooishiniibanag
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oaamooishiniibaning
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oaamooishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oaamooishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oaamooishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: aamooensimishinaaniban
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: aamooensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: aamooensimishiwaaiban
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: aamooensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: aamooensimishiniiban
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: aamooensimishini***idig, idog***
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: aamooenhimishinaaniban
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: aamooenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: aamooenhimishiwaaiban
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: aamooenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: aamooenhimishiniiban
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: aamooenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: aamooensimishinaanan
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: aamooensimishinaanag
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: aamooensimishinaaning
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: aamooensimishiwaaan
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: aamooensimishiwaaag
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: aamooensimishiwaaing
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: aamooensimishinian
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: aamooensimishiniag
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: aamooensimishiniing
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: aamooenhimishinaanan
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: aamooenhimishinaanag
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: aamooenhimishinaaning
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: aamooenhimishiwaaan
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: aamooenhimishiwaaag
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: aamooenhimishiwaaing
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: aamooenhimishinian
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: aamooenhimishiniag
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: aamooenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: aamooensimishibanan
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: aamooensimishibanag
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: aamooensimishibaning
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: aamooensimish***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: aamooensimish***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: aamooensimish***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: aamooenhimishibanan
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: aamooenhimishibanag
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: aamooenhimishibaning
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: aamooenhimish***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: aamooenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: aamooenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aamooensiminaanibanan
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aamooensiminaanibanag
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aamooensiminaanibaning
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aamooensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aamooensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aamooensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aamooensimiwaaibanan
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aamooensimiwaaibanag
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aamooensimiwaaibaning
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aamooensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aamooensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aamooensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aamooensiminiibanan
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aamooensiminiibanag
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aamooensiminiibaning
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aamooensimini***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aamooensimini***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aamooensimini***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aamooenhiminaanibanan
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aamooenhiminaanibanag
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aamooenhiminaanibaning
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aamooenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aamooenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aamooenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aamooenhimiwaaibanan
     aamoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aamooenhimiwaaibanag
     aamoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aamooenhimiwaaibaning
     aamoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aamooenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aamooenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aamooenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aamooenhiminiibanan
     aamoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aamooenhiminiibanag
     aamoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aamooenhiminiibaning
     aamoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aamooenhimini***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aamooenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aamooenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aamooensishinaanibanan
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aamooensishinaanibanag
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aamooensishinaanibaning
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aamooensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aamooensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aamooensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aamooensishiwaaibanan
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aamooensishiwaaibanag
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aamooensishiwaaibaning
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aamooensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aamooensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aamooensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aamooensishiniibanan
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aamooensishiniibanag
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aamooensishiniibaning
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aamooensishini***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aamooensishini***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aamooensishini***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aamooenhishinaanibanan
     aamoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aamooenhishinaanibanag
     aamoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aamooenhishinaanibaning
